Utah statutes.
77-32-401.5.   Interim board -- Members -- Administrative support -- Duties.

(1)  Until the Indigent Defense Funds Board authorized by Section 77-32-401 is constituted after achieving the number of participating counties required by Sections 77-32-604 and 77-32-704, an interim board may be created within the Division of Finance composed of the following three members:

(a)  a county commissioner from a county participating in the Indigent Inmate Trust Fund pursuant to Section 77-32-502 appointed by the Utah Association of Counties;

(b)  a county attorney from a county participating in the Indigent Inmate Trust Fund pursuant to Section 77-32-502 appointed by the Utah Association of Counties; and

(c)  a representative appointed by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

(2)  The Division of Finance shall provide administrative support to the interim board.

(3) (a)  Members shall serve until the Indigent Defense Funds Board is constituted.

(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, a replacement shall be appointed for the remaining unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(5)  The per diem and travel expenses for board members under Subsection (4) shall be paid from the Indigent Inmate Trust Fund in Section 77-32-502.

(6)  Until the Indigent Defense Funds Board is constituted, the interim board shall be authorized to carry out any responsibility provided  to the Indigent Defense Funds Board in statute as it relates to Chapter 32, Part 5, Indigent Inmates.

(7)  The action by two members present shall constitute the action of the board.

